District of Columbia statutes.
8-111.10

Civil infractions.

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter, or the rules authorized by this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

May 1, 1990, D.C. Law 8-116, § 11, 37 DCR 1641
1981 Ed., § 6-991.10.